Texas, session 892, SB27.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  The heading to Subchapter A, Chapter 2206, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER A. LIMITATIONS ON PURPOSE, [AND] USE, AND LOCATION OF PROPERTY ACQUIRED THROUGH EMINENT DOMAIN SECTION 2.  Subchapter A, Chapter 2206, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 2206.003 to read as follows: Sec. 2206.003.  LIMITATION ON USE OF EMINENT DOMAIN OUTSIDE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION BOUNDARIES. Notwithstanding any other law, a political subdivision of this state may not take through the use of eminent domain private property located outside the political subdivision's boundaries. SECTION 3.  Section 2206.003, Government Code, as added by this Act, applies only to the taking of private property by eminent domain for which a condemnation petition is filed on or after the effective date of this Act. A taking for which a condemnation petition is filed before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect immediately before that date, and that law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.